tools/mt/apertium/tagsets/modify-tags.regex
[
 [ %<clb%> -> %<cm%> || %, _ ] .o.
 [ %<punct%> -> %<guio%> || %- _ ] .o.
 [ %<clb%> -> %<sent%> || %. _ ] .o.
 [ %<clb%> -> %<sent%> || %? _ ] .o.
 [ %<clb%> -> %<sent%> || %: _ ] .o.
 [ %<clb%> -> %<sent%> || %; _ ] .o.
 [ %^ e x c l %<clb%> -> %! %<sent%> ] .o.
 [ %<interj%> -> %<ij%> ] .o.
 [ %<v%> -> %<vblex%> ] .o.
 [ %<clt%_hai%> -> %+hai%<adv%> ] .o.
 [ %<sem%_plc%> -> %<top%> ] .o.
 [ %<sg1%> -> %<p1%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<sg2%> -> %<p2%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<sg3%> -> %<p3%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<pl1%> -> %<p1%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<pl2%> -> %<p2%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<pl3%> -> %<p3%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<scsg1%> -> %<p1%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<scsg2%> -> %<p2%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<scsg3%> -> %<p3%> %<sg%> ] .o.
 [ %<scpl1%> -> %<p1%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<scpl2%> -> %<p2%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<scpl3%> -> %<p3%> %<pl%> ] .o.
 [ %<actv%> %<ind%> %<prs%> -> %<actv%> %<pri%> ] .o.
 [ %<actv%> %<ind%> %<prt%> %<conneg%> -> %<actv%> %<past%> %<sg%> %<conneg%> ] .o.
 [ %<actv%> %<ind%> %<prt%> -> %<actv%> %<past%> ] .o.
 [ %<n%> %<prop%> -> %<np%> ] 
];
